Louisiana, session 2026, SB253.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 37:23.5 is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§23.5. Peptides; prohibited regulations
A. No professional or occupational licensing board shall prohibit a
healthcare provider with prescriptive authority from providing patients with
peptides shipped from either of the following:
(1) A FDA-registered 503B outsourcing facility that is in compliance with
21 U.S.C. 353b.
(2) A 503A compounding pharmacy that is in compliance with 21 U.S.C.
353a and applicable United States Pharmacopeia - National Formulary
chapters.
B. No professional or occupational licensing board shall prohibit a
Louisiana licensed pharmacist in a state permitted pharmacy from
compounding and dispensing peptides as long as the Louisiana licensed
Page 1 of 2
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 253 ENROLLED
pharmacist in the state permitted pharmacy is in compliance with 21 U.S.C.
353a and applicable United States Pharmacopeia - National Formulary
chapters.
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 2 of 2
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.